src/phonology/sjt-phon.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Ter Sami morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
!! Alphabet
а А ӓ Ӓ а̄ А̄ б Б в В г Г д Д е Е ё Ё е̄ Е̄ ё̄ Ё̄ ж Ж з З һ Һ и И ӣ Ӣ й Й ҋ Ҋ к К л Л ӆ Ӆ м М ӎ Ӎ н Н ӊ Ӊ ӈ Ӈ о О о̄ О̄ п П р Р ҏ Ҏ с С т Т у У ӱ Ӱ ӯ Ӯ ф Ф х Х ц Ц ч Ч ш Ш щ Щ ы Ы ы̄ Ы̄ ь Ь ъ Ъ ҍ Ҍ э Э ӭ Ӭ э̄ Э̄ ю Ю ю̄ Ю̄ я Я я̄ Я̄ 

к:0 п:0 т:0 ь:0 ҍ:0

!! Trigger symbols
%^2VAPOC:0 ! second-syllable-vowel apocope
%^DPAL:0   ! depalatalization
%^AUML:0   ! a-umlaut, e.g. 3Sg.Prs or Ill.Sg
%^WG:0     ! weak consonant stem gradation

!! Morpheme boundaries
%> ! Inflectional suffix
%^ ! (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
%- ! Hyphen for question particle; from sjd, unclear how/whether to use it here

;

Sets

VOW = а е ё и о у ы э ю я  
        а̄ е̄ ё̄ ӣ о̄ ӯ ы̄ э̄ ю̄ я̄
        ӓ         ӱ ӹ ӭ  
;

CON = б в г д ж з Һ й ҋ к л ӆ м ӎ н ӊ ӈ п р ҏ с т ф х ц ч ш щ  
;

CONSTOPVL = к п т ц ч
; 

MARKPAL = ь ҍ
; 
 
DUMMY = %^2VAPOC %^DPAL %^AUML %^WG 
;
 
Definitions

GEMIN = [ д т |
          н н
                ]
;

SIMPL = [ д |
          н     ]
;

CSTRO = [ д ц |
          һ ц ь ]
;

CWEAK = [ ц 
                ]
; 
 
Rules

!The following sets of rules are purely orthographical, they model underlying -э, -а, ¿-ы? in order to surface as -ё, -ӭ, -я, -ӓ, ¿-ӹ? once a palatalization mark or й is replaced
!Surface -е/-ӭ (from -э) replacing ь/ҍ
"Palatal vowel adjustment I"
MARKPAL:0 <=> CON: _   (DUMMY:0) (DUMMY:0) %>: э: ;
"Palatal vowel adjustment II"
э:е       <=> CON: ь:0 (DUMMY:0) (DUMMY:0) %>: _  ;
"Palatal vowel adjustment III"
э:ӭ       <=> CON: ҍ:0 (DUMMY:0) (DUMMY:0) %>: _  ;
!а:я
!а:ӓ
!---
!Surface -е/-я (from -э/-а) after ч
"Palatal vowel adjustment (after ч) I"
э:е <=> ч (DUMMY:0) (DUMMY:0) %>: _ ;
"Palatal vowel adjustment (after ч) II"
а:я <=> ч (DUMMY:0) (DUMMY:0) %>: _ ;
!---
!Surface -е/-я (from -э/-а) after й, ҋ
"Palatal vowel adjustment (after й, ҋ) Ia"
й:0 <=> _   (DUMMY:0) (DUMMY:0) %>: э: ;
"Palatal vowel adjustment (after й, ҋ) Ib"
э:е <=> й:0 (DUMMY:0) (DUMMY:0) %>: _  ;
"Palatal vowel adjustment (after й, ҋ) IIa"
й:0 <=> _   (DUMMY:0) (DUMMY:0) %>: а: ;
"Palatal vowel adjustment (after й, ҋ) IIb"
а:я <=> й:0 (DUMMY:0) (DUMMY:0) %>: _  ;
!ҋ
!---
!---
!The following sets of rules model the various consonant stems undergoing gradation
!continuant geminates (except й), where the rule removes the first constituent, e.g. кылль:кыль, мырр:мыр
"Quantitative CG xx:x (of nonpal/pal continuants)" 
Cx:0 <=> _ Cx (MARKPAL:) %^WG:0 ;
 where Cx in ( в ж з л ӆ м ӎ н ӊ ӈ р ҏ ф х ) ;
!continuant geminate й, where the rule removes the first constituent (second constituent also undergoing a rule, see above)
"Quantitative CG xx:x (of й)"
й:0  <=> _ й:            %^WG:0 ;
!ҋ
!--- 
!stop and affricate geminates, where the rule removes the first constituent, e.g. 
"Quantitative CG xx:x (of stops/affricates)"
CONSTOPVL:0 <=> Cx _ (MARKPAL:) %^WG:0 ;
 where Cx in ( б д г ) ;!list is perhaps incomplete
!       Cy in ( д ) ;!list is perhaps incomplete
!       matched ;
!---
!clusters (except лльй), where the rule removes the first constituent of the first part of the cluster, e.g. са̄ррн:са̄рн, ко̄ллм:ко̄лм, сыййт:сыйт, пе̄ййв:пе̄йв, алльм:альм
"Quantitative CG xxy:xy (of nonpal/pal clusters)"
Cx:0 <=> _ Cx (MARKPAL:) Cy %^WG:0 ;
 where Cx in ( в в л л й й й м н н п р р ш ш )!list is perhaps incomplete
       Cy in ( р т к м в н т ч ц ч ч н т к т )!list is perhaps incomplete
       matched ;
!€ пеййв%^WG
!€ пе0йв0
!
!€ алльм%^WG
!€ а0льм0
!---
!cluster лльй, where the rule removes the first constituent of the first part of the cluster, e.g.
!л:0 <=> _ л ь й: %^WG:0 ;
!---
!preaspirated stops and affricates, where һ is removed, e.g. һк:к, һт:т
"Qualitative CG һC:C (short preaspiration)" 
һ:0 <=> _ CONSTOPVL (MARKPAL:) %^WG:0 ;




!!Rules for depalatalization in various consonant stems
!!Depalatalization in singleton or geminate non-dental continuants, e.g. кӯлль:кӯлл-
!"C-final depal (continuants)"
!MARKPAL:0 <=> Cx: Cx _ (DUMMY:0) %^DPAL:0 ;
! where Cx in ( в ж з л ӆ м ӎ н ӊ ӈ р ҏ ф х ) ;!check дж and дз
!!Depalatalization in singleton or geminate non-dental continuants, e.g. пуэдтҍ-:пуэдт
!"C-final depal (stops)"
!MARKPAL:0 <=> Cx Cy: _ (DUMMY:0) %^DPAL:0 ;
! where Cx in ( д д д б г )  
!       Cy in ( т ц ч п к )
!       matched ;

 
!!Morphonologically, the following two rules describe one and the same process
!"Depalatalization (cluster medial palatal mark deletion)" !я̄ввьр:а̄ввр-
!ь:0 <=> VOW Cx:+ _ Cy (DUMMY:0) %^DPAL:0 ;
! where Cx in ( в )  
!       Cy in ( р )
!       matched ;

!!The following two combined rules describe the a-umlaut (diphthongization) of о̄-уа
!"Umlaut о̄-уа I" ! уа:0о (чуанн-:чонн)
!о:у <=> _ о: GEMIN %^AUML:0 ;
!"Umlaut о̄-уа II" ! уа:0о (чуанн-:чонн)
!о:а <=> о: _ GEMIN %^AUML:0 ;
!
!!"Testing Macron"
!!е̄:я̄ <=> _ л л ь: (DUMMY:) %^AUML:0 ;
!! where Cx in ( о )
!!       Cy in ( ӯ )
!!       matched ;
!!Cx:Cy <=> _ н н %^AUML:0 ;
!! where Cx in ( о̄ )
!!       Cy in ( ӯ )
!!       matched ;
!
!
!!The following rule describe the umlaut reperesented by уэ-уа in orthography
!"Ablaut уэ-уа"
!э:а <=> у _ [GEMIN|SIMPL] ҍ:0 (DUMMY:0) %^AUML:0 ;
!
!
!"2syllableV apocope" !пя̄дцэл:пя̄дцл-, куагар:куагр-
!Cx:0 <=> VOW [CSTRO|CWEAK] _ CON (MARKPAL) %^2VAPOC:0 ; !CON can be defined less generally
! where Cx in ( э а ) ;
